Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.100

Minimum capital, surplus, undivided profits, and net earnings.

(1) A business development company shall maintain an amount of minimum capital, surplus, and undivided profits that, based upon the determination of the director, shall be deemed safe and sound for each business development company. However, the minimum ratio of paid-in capital to total assets, inclusive of all qualified loans and qualified investments, shall be and remain no less than eight percent.

(2) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, minimum capital, surplus, undivided profits, and net earnings shall be determined by the board of directors, subject to the exercise of prudent business judgment.

[ 2006 c 87 s 13; 1963 c 162 s 10.]